Wyoming, session 2025, SF0045.
Be It Enacted by the Legislature of the State of Wyoming:

Section 1. W.S. 19-10-101(a) and (b), 19-10-102 and
19-10-103 are amended to read:

SF0045

2025 STATE OF WYOMING 25LSO-0245
19-10-101. Organization by governor; appointment of
council; removal; control.

(a) If the national guard of Wyoming is ordered into
the service of the United States, The governor may organize
and maintain within this state during that period, under
such regulations as the secretary of defense may prescribe,
such military forces as may be authorized by the secretary
of defense or as the governor deems necessary for the
defense to preserve the public peace, to execute the laws
of the state, to suppress insurrection or to repel
invasion. The forces shall be known as the Wyoming state
guard. Insofar as practicable, the existing laws, rules and
regulations governing the national guard shall be applied
to used as a model for the control and governance of the
Wyoming state guard. The force shall be of such strength as
directed by the secretary of defense, with such expansion
in the future as may be authorized. The Wyoming state guard
shall be of such strength and shall be armed, trained and
equipped in such manner as may be prescribed by the
secretary of defense or the governor of Wyoming.

SF0045

2025 STATE OF WYOMING 25LSO-0245
(b) For the purpose of coordinating desirable
national state defense activities, the governor shall
appoint a Wyoming state council of defense. The council,
subject to the approval of the governor, may organize
necessary subordinate branches and establish rules and
regulations for the operation of the council and
subordinate branches, and assist in all matters pertaining
to the Wyoming state guard and other state or national
defense activities not otherwise covered by law.
Appointment to the council of defense is not limited by any
requirements as to prior military or naval service. The
governor may remove any member as provided in W.S. 9-1-202.

19-10-102. Pay and allowances.

Members of the Wyoming state guard, when serving under
orders of the governor of Wyoming, shall receive out of by
legislative appropriation from the general fund of Wyoming
not otherwise appropriated or by the governor from the
continuous appropriation for public welfare emergencies
under W.S. 9-2-1014.3, pay and allowances as determined by
the Wyoming state council of defense, but not more than
seventy-five percent (75%) of the same pay and allowances
SF0045

2025 STATE OF WYOMING 25LSO-0245
authorized for personnel of equal rank in the national
guard.

19-10-103. Requisition of arms and supplies.

The governor may requisition or purchase from the
department of defense or other sources such arms, equipment
and supplies as are necessary to equip the Wyoming state
guard and may make available to such forces the facilities
and equipment of state armories and other state premises
and property as are available and necessary.

Section 2. There is appropriated twenty-five thousand
dollars ($25,000.00) from the general fund to the office of
the governor for purposes of appointing and convening a
Wyoming state council of defense and for establishing and
equipping the Wyoming state guard as the governor deems
necessary. This appropriation shall be for the period
beginning with the effective date of this act and ending
June 30, 2026. This appropriation shall not be transferred
or expended for any other purpose and any unexpended,
unobligated funds remaining from this appropriation shall
revert as provided by law on June 30, 2026. It is the
SF0045

2025 STATE OF WYOMING 25LSO-0245
intent of the legislature that this appropriation not be
included in the office of the governor's standard budget
for the immediately succeeding fiscal biennium.

Section 3. This act is effective July 1, 2025.

(END)
SF0045